Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-5718
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Nebraska Clean Indoor Air Act, the definitions found in sections 71-5718.01 to 71-5728 apply.

Laws 2008, LB395, § 3;

Laws 2020, LB840, § 3.